Illinois, session 104th, SB655.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Veterans' Employment Representative Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 50/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 186a)7    Sec. 1. Veteran services; representative. The The 8Department of Employment Security shall assign at least one 9full time Veterans' Employment Representative, defined by 10title and classification under the Personnel Code of Illinois, 11to each full service office of the employment service, to work 12exclusively in job counseling, training, and placement of 13veterans. Preference for these positions shall be given to 14qualified persons who have been members of the armed forces of 15the United States in times of hostilities with a foreign 16country. Any candidate for these positions shall be deemed to 17have met and satisfied examination admission requirements if 18the candidate served in the armed forces during times of 19hostilities with a foreign country and was honorably 20discharged therefrom due to a combat-related disability. The 21holder of such a position shall be administratively 22responsible to the local office manager, and his or her first 23line responsibility is functional supervision of all local   SB0655- 2 -LRB104 06960 KTG 16997 b1office services to veterans. He or she may also be delegated 2line supervision of veteran units, assistant local veterans' 3employment representative, or veteran aid. Individualized 4veterans' services such as application taking, counseling, job 5referral, or training will continue to be provided to veterans 6on a priority basis by all local office staff.7(Source: P.A. 98-107, eff. 7-23-13.)